Illinois, session 104th, SB89.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 203 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/203)7    Sec. 203. Base income defined. 8    (a) Individuals.9        (1) In general. In the case of an individual, base 10    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's adjusted 11    gross income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph 12    (2).13        (2) Modifications. The adjusted gross income referred 14    to in paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto 15    the sum of the following amounts:16            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 17        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 18        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 19        in the computation of adjusted gross income, except 20        stock dividends of qualified public utilities 21        described in Section 305(e) of the Internal Revenue 22        Code;23            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by   SB0089- 2 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 2        the computation of adjusted gross income for the 3        taxable year;4            (C) An amount equal to the amount received during 5        the taxable year as a recovery or refund of real 6        property taxes paid with respect to the taxpayer's 7        principal residence under the Revenue Act of 1939 and 8        for which a deduction was previously taken under 9        subparagraph (L) of this paragraph (2) prior to July 10        1, 1991, the retrospective application date of Article 11        4 of Public Act 87-17. In the case of multi-unit or 12        multi-use structures and farm dwellings, the taxes on 13        the taxpayer's principal residence shall be that 14        portion of the total taxes for the entire property 15        which is attributable to such principal residence;16            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 17        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 18        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 19        computation of adjusted gross income;20            (D-5) An amount, to the extent not included in 21        adjusted gross income, equal to the amount of money 22        withdrawn by the taxpayer in the taxable year from a 23        medical care savings account and the interest earned 24        on the account in the taxable year of a withdrawal 25        pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 20 of the 26        Medical Care Savings Account Act or subsection (b) of   SB0089- 3 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        Section 20 of the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2        2000;3            (D-10) For taxable years ending after December 31, 4        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 5        costs that the individual deducted in computing 6        adjusted gross income and for which the individual 7        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;8            (D-15) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 9        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 10        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 11        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 12        the Internal Revenue Code;13            (D-16) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 14        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 15        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 16        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 17        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 18        deductions taken in all taxable years under 19        subparagraph (Z) with respect to that property.20            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 21        the last day of the last tax year for which a 22        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 23        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 24        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 25        modification under subparagraph (Z), then an amount 26        equal to that subtraction modification.   SB0089- 4 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 2        modification under this subparagraph only once with 3        respect to any one piece of property;4            (D-17) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 5        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 6        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 7        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 9        member of the same unitary business group but for the 10        fact that foreign person's business activity outside 11        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 12        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 13        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 14        who would be a member of the same unitary business 15        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 16        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 17        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 18        required to apportion business income under different 19        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 20        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 21        extent that dividends were included in base income of 22        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 23        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 24        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 25        included in gross income under Sections 951 through 26        964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts included   SB0089- 5 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        in gross income under Section 78 of the Internal 2        Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of the same 3        person to whom the interest was paid, accrued, or 4        incurred.5            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 6                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 7            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 8            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 9            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 10            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 11            with respect to such interest; or12                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 13            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 14            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 15            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 16            following:17                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 18                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 19                to a person that is not a related member, and20                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 21                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 22                person did not have as a principal purpose the 23                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 24                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 25                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 26                terms; or   SB0089- 6 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 2            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 3            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 4            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 5            and terms and the principal purpose for the 6            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 7            or 8                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 9            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 10            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 11            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 12            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 13            to the application or use of an alternative method 14            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 15                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 16            Director from making any other adjustment 17            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 18            for any tax year beginning after the effective 19            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 20            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 21            Department and such regulations provide methods 22            and standards by which the Department will utilize 23            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 24            (D-18) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 25        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 26        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or   SB0089- 7 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 2        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 3        foreign person who would be a member of the same 4        unitary business group but for the fact that the 5        foreign person's business activity outside the United 6        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 7        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 9        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 10        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 11        from being included in the unitary business group 12        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 13        business income under different subsections of Section 14        304. The addition modification required by this 15        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 16        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 17        group for the same taxable year and received by the 18        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 19        business group (including amounts included in gross 20        income under Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal 21        Revenue Code and amounts included in gross income 22        under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) with 23        respect to the stock of the same person to whom the 24        intangible expenses and costs were directly or 25        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 26        sentence does not apply to the extent that the same   SB0089- 8 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 2        modification required under Section 203(a)(2)(D-17) of 3        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 4        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 5        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 6        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 7        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 8        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 9        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 10        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 11        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 12        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 13        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 14        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 15        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 16        similar types of intangible assets.17            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:18                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 19            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 20            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 21            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 22            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 23            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 24            with respect to such item; or25                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 26            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or   SB0089- 9 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 2            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 3            following:4                    (a) the person during the same taxable 5                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 6                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 7                not a related member, and8                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 9                intangible expense or cost between the 10                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 11                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 12                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 13                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 14                or15                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 16            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 17            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 18            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 19            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 20            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 21            writing to the application or use of an 22            alternative method of apportionment under Section 23            304(f); 24                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 25            Director from making any other adjustment 26            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act   SB0089- 10 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            for any tax year beginning after the effective 2            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 3            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 4            Department and such regulations provide methods 5            and standards by which the Department will utilize 6            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 7            (D-19) For taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 9        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 10        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 11        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 12        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 13        business group but for the fact that the person is 14        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 15        included in the unitary business group because he or 16        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 17        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 18        addition modification required by this subparagraph 19        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 20        included in base income of the unitary group for the 21        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 22        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 23        (including amounts included in gross income under 24        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 25        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 26        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the   SB0089- 11 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 2        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 3        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 4        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 5        the addition modification required under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-17) or Section 203(a)(2)(D-18) of this 7        Act; 8            (D-20) For taxable years beginning on or after 9        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 10        2006, in the case of a distribution from a qualified 11        tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal 12        Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution from a 13        College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 of the 14        State Treasurer Act or (ii) a distribution from the 15        Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, an amount equal 16        to the amount excluded from gross income under Section 17        529(c)(3)(B). For taxable years beginning on or after 18        January 1, 2007, in the case of a distribution from a 19        qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 20        Internal Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution 21        from a College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 22        of the State Treasurer Act, (ii) a distribution from 23        the Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, or (iii) a 24        distribution from a qualified tuition program under 25        Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code that (I) 26        adopts and determines that its offering materials   SB0089- 12 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        comply with the College Savings Plans Network's 2        disclosure principles and (II) has made reasonable 3        efforts to inform in-state residents of the existence 4        of in-state qualified tuition programs by informing 5        Illinois residents directly and, where applicable, to 6        inform financial intermediaries distributing the 7        program to inform in-state residents of the existence 8        of in-state qualified tuition programs at least 9        annually, an amount equal to the amount excluded from 10        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(B).11            For the purposes of this subparagraph (D-20), a 12        qualified tuition program has made reasonable efforts 13        if it makes disclosures (which may use the term 14        "in-state program" or "in-state plan" and need not 15        specifically refer to Illinois or its qualified 16        programs by name) (i) directly to prospective 17        participants in its offering materials or makes a 18        public disclosure, such as a website posting; and (ii) 19        where applicable, to intermediaries selling the 20        out-of-state program in the same manner that the 21        out-of-state program distributes its offering 22        materials;23            (D-20.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2018, in the case of a distribution from a 25        qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 26        Internal Revenue Code, other than a distribution from   SB0089- 13 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        a qualified ABLE program created under Section 16.6 of 2        the State Treasurer Act, an amount equal to the amount 3        excluded from gross income under Section 529A(c)(1)(B) 4        of the Internal Revenue Code; 5            (D-21) For taxable years beginning on or after 6        January 1, 2007, in the case of transfer of moneys from 7        a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by the 9        State to an out-of-state program, an amount equal to 10        the amount of moneys previously deducted from base 11        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section;12            (D-21.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 13        January 1, 2018, in the case of the transfer of moneys 14        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 or 15        a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 16        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by this 17        State to an ABLE account established under an 18        out-of-state ABLE account program, an amount equal to 19        the contribution component of the transferred amount 20        that was previously deducted from base income under 21        subsection (a)(2)(Y) or subsection (a)(2)(HH) of this 22        Section; 23            (D-22) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2009, and prior to January 1, 2018, in the 25        case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund of moneys 26        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of   SB0089- 14 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 2        that is not used for qualified expenses at an eligible 3        education institution, an amount equal to the 4        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 5        or refund that was previously deducted from base 6        income under subsection (a)(2)(y) of this Section, 7        provided that the withdrawal or refund did not result 8        from the beneficiary's death or disability. For 9        taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018: 10        (1) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or 11        refund, as defined under Section 16.5 of the State 12        Treasurer Act, of moneys from a qualified tuition 13        program under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code 14        administered by the State, an amount equal to the 15        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 16        or refund that was previously deducted from base 17        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section, and 18        (2) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund 19        from a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of 20        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 21        that is not used for qualified disability expenses, an 22        amount equal to the contribution component of the 23        nonqualified withdrawal or refund that was previously 24        deducted from base income under subsection (a)(2)(HH) 25        of this Section;26            (D-23) An amount equal to the credit allowable to   SB0089- 15 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 2        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 3        Act;4            (D-24) For taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 6        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 7        for the taxable year; 8            (D-25) In the case of a resident, an amount equal 9        to the amount of tax for which a credit is allowed 10        pursuant to Section 201(p)(7) of this Act; 11    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 12    following amounts:13            (E) For taxable years ending before December 31, 14        2001, any amount included in such total in respect of 15        any compensation (including but not limited to any 16        compensation paid or accrued to a serviceman while a 17        prisoner of war or missing in action) paid to a 18        resident by reason of being on active duty in the Armed 19        Forces of the United States and in respect of any 20        compensation paid or accrued to a resident who as a 21        governmental employee was a prisoner of war or missing 22        in action, and in respect of any compensation paid to a 23        resident in 1971 or thereafter for annual training 24        performed pursuant to Sections 502 and 503, Title 32, 25        United States Code as a member of the Illinois 26        National Guard or, beginning with taxable years ending   SB0089- 16 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        on or after December 31, 2007, the National Guard of 2        any other state. For taxable years ending on or after 3        December 31, 2001, any amount included in such total 4        in respect of any compensation (including but not 5        limited to any compensation paid or accrued to a 6        serviceman while a prisoner of war or missing in 7        action) paid to a resident by reason of being a member 8        of any component of the uniformed services Armed 9        Forces of the United States and in respect of any 10        compensation paid or accrued to a resident who as a 11        governmental employee was a prisoner of war or missing 12        in action, and in respect of any compensation paid to a 13        resident in 2001 or thereafter by reason of being a 14        member of the Illinois National Guard or, beginning 15        with taxable years ending on or after December 31, 16        2007, the National Guard of any other state. As used in 17        this subparagraph (E), for taxable years ending before 18        December 31, 2025, "uniformed services" means the 19        Armed Forces of the United States. As used in this 20        subparagraph (E), for taxable years ending on or after 21        December 31, 2025, "uniformed services" has the 22        meaning given to that term in 37 U.S.C. 101. The 23        provisions of this subparagraph (E) are exempt from 24        the provisions of Section 250;25            (F) An amount equal to all amounts included in 26        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections   SB0089- 17 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a), and 2        408 of the Internal Revenue Code, or included in such 3        total as distributions under the provisions of any 4        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 5        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 6        retired partners, which payments are excluded in 7        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 8        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 9        adopted pursuant thereto;10            (G) The valuation limitation amount;11            (H) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 12        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 13        and included in such total for the taxable year;14            (I) An amount equal to all amounts included in 15        such total pursuant to the provisions of Section 111 16        of the Internal Revenue Code as a recovery of items 17        previously deducted from adjusted gross income in the 18        computation of taxable income;19            (J) An amount equal to those dividends included in 20        such total which were paid by a corporation which 21        conducts business operations in a River Edge 22        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 23        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act, and conducts 24        substantially all of its operations in a River Edge 25        Redevelopment Zone or zones. This subparagraph (J) is 26        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;  SB0089- 18 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 2        such total that were paid by a corporation that 3        conducts business operations in a federally designated 4        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 5        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 6        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 7        subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 8        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 9        this subparagraph (K);10            (L) For taxable years ending after December 31, 11        1983, an amount equal to all social security benefits 12        and railroad retirement benefits included in such 13        total pursuant to Sections 72(r) and 86 of the 14        Internal Revenue Code;15            (M) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 16        under subparagraph (N), an amount equal to the sum of 17        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 18        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 19        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 20        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 21        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 22        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 23        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 24        Internal Revenue Code, plus, for taxable years ending 25        on or after December 31, 2011, Section 45G(e)(3) of 26        the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years   SB0089- 19 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 2        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 3        Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 4        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 5        250;6            (N) An amount equal to all amounts included in 7        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 8        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 9        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 10        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 11        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 12        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 13        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 14        net of bond premium amortization;15            (O) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 16        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 17        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;18            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 19        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 20        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 21        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 22        the Internal Revenue Code or of any itemized deduction 23        taken from adjusted gross income in the computation of 24        taxable income for restoration of substantial amounts 25        held under claim of right for the taxable year;26            (Q) An amount equal to any amounts included in   SB0089- 20 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        such total, received by the taxpayer as an 2        acceleration in the payment of life, endowment or 3        annuity benefits in advance of the time they would 4        otherwise be payable as an indemnity for a terminal 5        illness;6            (R) An amount equal to the amount of any federal or 7        State bonus paid to veterans of the Persian Gulf War;8            (S) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 9        gross income, equal to the amount of a contribution 10        made in the taxable year on behalf of the taxpayer to a 11        medical care savings account established under the 12        Medical Care Savings Account Act or the Medical Care 13        Savings Account Act of 2000 to the extent the 14        contribution is accepted by the account administrator 15        as provided in that Act;16            (T) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 17        gross income, equal to the amount of interest earned 18        in the taxable year on a medical care savings account 19        established under the Medical Care Savings Account Act 20        or the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2000 on 21        behalf of the taxpayer, other than interest added 22        pursuant to item (D-5) of this paragraph (2);23            (U) For one taxable year beginning on or after 24        January 1, 1994, an amount equal to the total amount of 25        tax imposed and paid under subsections (a) and (b) of 26        Section 201 of this Act on grant amounts received by   SB0089- 21 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        the taxpayer under the Nursing Home Grant Assistance 2        Act during the taxpayer's taxable years 1992 and 1993;3            (V) Beginning with tax years ending on or after 4        December 31, 1995 and ending with tax years ending on 5        or before December 31, 2004, an amount equal to the 6        amount paid by a taxpayer who is a self-employed 7        taxpayer, a partner of a partnership, or a shareholder 8        in a Subchapter S corporation for health insurance or 9        long-term care insurance for that taxpayer or that 10        taxpayer's spouse or dependents, to the extent that 11        the amount paid for that health insurance or long-term 12        care insurance may be deducted under Section 213 of 13        the Internal Revenue Code, has not been deducted on 14        the federal income tax return of the taxpayer, and 15        does not exceed the taxable income attributable to 16        that taxpayer's income, self-employment income, or 17        Subchapter S corporation income; except that no 18        deduction shall be allowed under this item (V) if the 19        taxpayer is eligible to participate in any health 20        insurance or long-term care insurance plan of an 21        employer of the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse. The 22        amount of the health insurance and long-term care 23        insurance subtracted under this item (V) shall be 24        determined by multiplying total health insurance and 25        long-term care insurance premiums paid by the taxpayer 26        times a number that represents the fractional   SB0089- 22 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        percentage of eligible medical expenses under Section 2        213 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 not actually 3        deducted on the taxpayer's federal income tax return;4            (W) For taxable years beginning on or after 5        January 1, 1998, all amounts included in the 6        taxpayer's federal gross income in the taxable year 7        from amounts converted from a regular IRA to a Roth 8        IRA. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 9        Section 250;10            (X) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 11        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 12        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 13        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 14        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 15        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 16        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 17        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 18        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 19        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 20        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 21        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 22        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 23        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 24        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 25        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 26        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons   SB0089- 23 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 2        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 3        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 4        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 5        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 6        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this 7        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 8        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 9        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 10        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 11        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 12        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 13        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 14        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 15        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 16        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;17            (Y) For taxable years beginning on or after 18        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 19        2004, moneys contributed in the taxable year to a 20        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 21        State Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from 22        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 23        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 24        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For taxable 25        years beginning on or after January 1, 2005, a maximum 26        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to (i) a   SB0089- 24 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 2        State Treasurer Act or (ii) the Illinois Prepaid 3        Tuition Trust Fund, except that amounts excluded from 4        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 5        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 6        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For purposes 7        of this subparagraph, contributions made by an 8        employer on behalf of an employee, or matching 9        contributions made by an employee, shall be treated as 10        made by the employee. This subparagraph (Y) is exempt 11        from the provisions of Section 250;12            (Z) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 13        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 14        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 15        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 16        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 17        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:18                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 19            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 20            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 21            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 22            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 23            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 24            including the bonus depreciation deduction;25                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 26            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30   SB0089- 25 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 2            0.429); and3                (3) for taxable years ending after December 4            31, 2005:5                    (i) for property on which a bonus 6                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 7                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 8                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 9                by 0.429);10                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 11                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 12                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 13                1.0;14                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 15                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 16                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 17                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 18                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 19                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 20                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 21                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 22                depreciation on that property; and23                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 24                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 25                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 26                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after   SB0089- 26 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 2                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 3                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 4                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 5                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 6                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 7            The aggregate amount deducted under this 8        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 9        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 10        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 11        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 12        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 13        subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the provisions of 14        Section 250;15            (AA) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 16        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 17        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 18        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 19        an amount equal to that addition modification. 20            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 21        the last day of the last tax year for which a 22        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 23        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 24        required in any taxable year to make an addition 25        modification under subparagraph (D-15), then an amount 26        equal to that addition modification.   SB0089- 27 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 2        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 3        one piece of property.4            This subparagraph (AA) is exempt from the 5        provisions of Section 250;6            (BB) Any amount included in adjusted gross income, 7        other than salary, received by a driver in a 8        ridesharing arrangement using a motor vehicle;9            (CC) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 10        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 11        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 12        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 13        modification with respect to such transaction under 14        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 15        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 16        the amount of that addition modification, and (ii) any 17        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 18        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 19        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 20        that is required to make an addition modification with 21        respect to such transaction under Section 22        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 23        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of that 24        addition modification. This subparagraph (CC) is 25        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;26            (DD) An amount equal to the interest income taken   SB0089- 28 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        into account for the taxable year (net of the 2        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 3        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 4        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 5        for the fact that the foreign person's business 6        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 7        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 8        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 9        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 10        business group but for the fact that the person is 11        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 12        included in the unitary business group because he or 13        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 14        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 15        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 16        made for the same taxable year under Section 17        203(a)(2)(D-17) for interest paid, accrued, or 18        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 19        This subparagraph (DD) is exempt from the provisions 20        of Section 250; 21            (EE) An amount equal to the income from intangible 22        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 23        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 24        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 25        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 26        for the fact that the foreign person's business   SB0089- 29 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 2        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 3        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 4        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 5        business group but for the fact that the person is 6        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 7        included in the unitary business group because he or 8        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 9        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 10        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 11        made for the same taxable year under Section 12        203(a)(2)(D-18) for intangible expenses and costs 13        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 14        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (EE) is 15        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;16            (FF) An amount equal to any amount awarded to the 17        taxpayer during the taxable year by the Court of 18        Claims under subsection (c) of Section 8 of the Court 19        of Claims Act for time unjustly served in a State 20        prison. This subparagraph (FF) is exempt from the 21        provisions of Section 250; 22            (GG) For taxable years ending on or after December 23        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 24        add back any insurance premiums under Section 25        203(a)(2)(D-19), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 26        that part of a reimbursement received from the   SB0089- 30 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 2        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 3        company) that would have been taken into account as a 4        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 5        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 6        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 7        (GG), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 8        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 9        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (GG). This 10        subparagraph (GG) is exempt from the provisions of 11        Section 250; 12            (HH) For taxable years beginning on or after 13        January 1, 2018 and prior to January 1, 2028, a maximum 14        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to a 15        qualified ABLE account under Section 16.6 of the State 16        Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from gross 17        income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) or Section 18        529A(c)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not 19        be considered moneys contributed under this 20        subparagraph (HH). For purposes of this subparagraph 21        (HH), contributions made by an employer on behalf of 22        an employee, or matching contributions made by an 23        employee, shall be treated as made by the employee; 24            (II) For taxable years that begin on or after 25        January 1, 2021 and begin before January 1, 2026, the 26        amount that is included in the taxpayer's federal   SB0089- 31 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        adjusted gross income pursuant to Section 61 of the 2        Internal Revenue Code as discharge of indebtedness 3        attributable to student loan forgiveness and that is 4        not excluded from the taxpayer's federal adjusted 5        gross income pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection 6        (f) of Section 108 of the Internal Revenue Code; 7            (JJ) For taxable years beginning on or after 8        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 9        operating in this State and licensed under the 10        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 11        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 12        organization operating in this State and licensed 13        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 14        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 15        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 16        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 17        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 18        this subparagraph (JJ) are exempt from the provisions 19        of Section 250; and 20            (KK) To the extent includible in gross income for 21        federal income tax purposes, any amount awarded or 22        paid to the taxpayer as a result of a judgment or 23        settlement for fertility fraud as provided in Section 24        15 of the Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, donor 25        fertility fraud as provided in Section 20 of the 26        Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, or similar action in   SB0089- 32 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        another state; and 2            (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 3        January 1, 2026, if the taxpayer is a qualified 4        worker, as defined in the Workforce Development 5        through Charitable Loan Repayment Act, an amount equal 6        to the amount included in the taxpayer's federal 7        adjusted gross income that is attributable to student 8        loan repayment assistance received by the taxpayer 9        during the taxable year from a qualified community 10        foundation under the provisions of the Workforce 11        Development through Through Charitable Loan Repayment 12        Act. 13            This subparagraph (LL) is exempt from the 14        provisions of Section 250; and . 15            (MM) (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 16        January 1, 2025, if the taxpayer is an eligible 17        resident as defined in the Medical Debt Relief Act, an 18        amount equal to the amount included in the taxpayer's 19        federal adjusted gross income that is attributable to 20        medical debt relief received by the taxpayer during 21        the taxable year from a nonprofit medical debt relief 22        coordinator under the provisions of the Medical Debt 23        Relief Act. This subparagraph (MM) (LL) is exempt from 24        the provisions of Section 250.  25    (b) Corporations.  SB0089- 33 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        (1) In general. In the case of a corporation, base 2    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 3    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).4        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 5    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 6    of the following amounts:7            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 8        to the taxpayer as interest and all distributions 9        received from regulated investment companies during 10        the taxable year to the extent excluded from gross 11        income in the computation of taxable income;12            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 13        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 14        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 15        year;16            (C) In the case of a regulated investment company, 17        an amount equal to the excess of (i) the net long-term 18        capital gain for the taxable year, over (ii) the 19        amount of the capital gain dividends designated as 20        such in accordance with Section 852(b)(3)(C) of the 21        Internal Revenue Code and any amount designated under 22        Section 852(b)(3)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, 23        attributable to the taxable year (this amendatory Act 24        of 1995 (Public Act 89-89) is declarative of existing 25        law and is not a new enactment);26            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction   SB0089- 34 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 2        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 3        ending prior to December 31, 1986;4            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 5        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 6        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 7        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 8        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 9        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 10        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 11        subtraction modifications in such earlier taxable 12        year, with the following limitations applied in the 13        order that they are listed:14                (i) the addition modification relating to the 15            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 16            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 17            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 18            of addition modification under this subparagraph 19            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 20            which was taken into account in calculating the 21            base income of an earlier taxable year, and22                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 23            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 24            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 25            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 26            such carryback or carryforward;  SB0089- 35 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            For taxable years in which there is a net 2        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 3        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 4        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 5        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 6        computed independently under the preceding provisions 7        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;8            (E-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 9        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 10        costs that the corporation deducted in computing 11        adjusted gross income and for which the corporation 12        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;13            (E-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 14        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 15        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 16        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 17        the Internal Revenue Code;18            (E-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 19        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 20        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 21        addition modification under subparagraph (E-10), then 22        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 23        deductions taken in all taxable years under 24        subparagraph (T) with respect to that property.25            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 26        the last day of the last tax year for which a   SB0089- 36 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 2        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 3        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 4        modification under subparagraph (T), then an amount 5        equal to that subtraction modification. 6            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 7        modification under this subparagraph only once with 8        respect to any one piece of property;9            (E-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 10        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 11        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 12        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 13        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 14        member of the same unitary business group but for the 15        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 16        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 17        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 18        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 19        who would be a member of the same unitary business 20        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 21        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 22        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 23        required to apportion business income under different 24        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 25        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 26        extent that dividends were included in base income of   SB0089- 37 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 2        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 3        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 4        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 5        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 6        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 7        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 8        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 9        accrued, or incurred. 10            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 11                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 12            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 13            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 14            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 15            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 16            with respect to such interest; or17                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 18            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 19            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 20            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 21            following:22                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 23                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 24                to a person that is not a related member, and25                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 26                interest expense between the taxpayer and the   SB0089- 38 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1                person did not have as a principal purpose the 2                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 3                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 4                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 5                terms; or 6                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 7            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 8            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 9            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 10            and terms and the principal purpose for the 11            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 12            or 13                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 14            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 15            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 16            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 17            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 18            to the application or use of an alternative method 19            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 20                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 21            Director from making any other adjustment 22            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 23            for any tax year beginning after the effective 24            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 25            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 26            Department and such regulations provide methods   SB0089- 39 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            and standards by which the Department will utilize 2            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 3            (E-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 4        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 5        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 6        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 7        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 8        foreign person who would be a member of the same 9        unitary business group but for the fact that the 10        foreign person's business activity outside the United 11        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 12        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 13        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 14        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 15        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 16        from being included in the unitary business group 17        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 18        business income under different subsections of Section 19        304. The addition modification required by this 20        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 21        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 22        group for the same taxable year and received by the 23        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 24        business group (including amounts included in gross 25        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 26        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross   SB0089- 40 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 2        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 3        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 4        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 5        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 6        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 7        modification required under Section 203(b)(2)(E-12) of 8        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 9        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 10        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 11        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 12        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 13        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 14        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 15        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 16        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 17        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 18        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 19        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 20        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 21        similar types of intangible assets.22            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:23                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 24            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 25            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 26            is subject in a foreign country or state, other   SB0089- 41 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 2            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 3            with respect to such item; or4                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 5            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 6            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 7            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 8            following:9                    (a) the person during the same taxable 10                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 11                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 12                not a related member, and13                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 14                intangible expense or cost between the 15                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 16                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 17                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 18                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 19                or20                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 21            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 22            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 23            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 24            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 25            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 26            writing to the application or use of an   SB0089- 42 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            alternative method of apportionment under Section 2            304(f); 3                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 4            Director from making any other adjustment 5            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 6            for any tax year beginning after the effective 7            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 8            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 9            Department and such regulations provide methods 10            and standards by which the Department will utilize 11            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 12            (E-14) For taxable years ending on or after 13        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 14        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 15        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 16        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 17        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 18        business group but for the fact that the person is 19        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 20        included in the unitary business group because he or 21        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 22        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 23        addition modification required by this subparagraph 24        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 25        included in base income of the unitary group for the 26        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a   SB0089- 43 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 2        (including amounts included in gross income under 3        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 4        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 5        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 6        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 7        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 8        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 9        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 10        the addition modification required under Section 11        203(b)(2)(E-12) or Section 203(b)(2)(E-13) of this 12        Act; 13            (E-15) For taxable years beginning after December 14        31, 2008, any deduction for dividends paid by a 15        captive real estate investment trust that is allowed 16        to a real estate investment trust under Section 17        857(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code for 18        dividends paid;19            (E-16) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 20        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 21        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 22        Act;23            (E-17) For taxable years ending on or after 24        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 25        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 26        for the taxable year;   SB0089- 44 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            (E-18) for taxable years beginning after December 2        31, 2018, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 3        under Section 250(a)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue 4        Code for the taxable year; 5            (E-19) for taxable years ending on or after June 6        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 7        under Section 250(a)(1)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue 8        Code for the taxable year; 9            (E-20) for taxable years ending on or after June 10        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 11        under Sections 243(e) and 245A(a) of the Internal 12        Revenue Code for the taxable year; 13            (E-21) the amount that is claimed as a federal 14        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 15        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 16        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 17        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 18        Tax Credit Act; 19    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 20    following amounts:21            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 22        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 23        and included in such total for the taxable year;24            (G) An amount equal to any amount included in such 25        total under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code;26            (H) In the case of a regulated investment company,   SB0089- 45 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        an amount equal to the amount of exempt interest 2        dividends as defined in subsection (b)(5) of Section 3        852 of the Internal Revenue Code, paid to shareholders 4        for the taxable year;5            (I) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 6        under subparagraph (J), an amount equal to the sum of 7        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 8        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) and amounts disallowed as 9        interest expense by Section 291(a)(3) of the Internal 10        Revenue Code, and all amounts of expenses allocable to 11        interest and disallowed as deductions by Section 12        265(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for 13        taxable years ending on or after August 13, 1999, 14        Sections 171(a)(2), 265, 280C, 291(a)(3), and 15        832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, plus, 16        for tax years ending on or after December 31, 2011, 17        amounts disallowed as deductions by Section 45G(e)(3) 18        of the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 19        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 20        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 21        Internal Revenue Code and the policyholders' share of 22        tax-exempt interest of a life insurance company under 23        Section 807(a)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 24        the case of a life insurance company with gross income 25        from a decrease in reserves for the tax year) or 26        Section 807(b)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in   SB0089- 46 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        the case of a life insurance company allowed a 2        deduction for an increase in reserves for the tax 3        year); the provisions of this subparagraph are exempt 4        from the provisions of Section 250;5            (J) An amount equal to all amounts included in 6        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 7        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 8        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 9        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 10        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 11        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 12        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 13        net of bond premium amortization;14            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 15        such total which were paid by a corporation which 16        conducts business operations in a River Edge 17        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 18        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 19        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 20        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 21        the provisions of Section 250;22            (L) An amount equal to those dividends included in 23        such total that were paid by a corporation that 24        conducts business operations in a federally designated 25        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 26        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided   SB0089- 47 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 2        subparagraph (K) of paragraph 2 of this subsection 3        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 4        this subparagraph (L);5            (M) For any taxpayer that is a financial 6        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 7        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 8        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 9        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 10        property which is eligible for the River Edge 11        Redevelopment Zone Investment Credit. To determine the 12        portion of a loan or loans that is secured by property 13        eligible for a Section 201(f) investment credit to the 14        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 15        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 16        divided into the basis of the Section 201(f) 17        investment credit property which secures the loan or 18        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 19        such property on the date that it was placed in service 20        in the River Edge Redevelopment Zone. The subtraction 21        modification available to the taxpayer in any year 22        under this subsection shall be that portion of the 23        total interest paid by the borrower with respect to 24        such loan attributable to the eligible property as 25        calculated under the previous sentence. This 26        subparagraph (M) is exempt from the provisions of   SB0089- 48 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        Section 250;2            (M-1) For any taxpayer that is a financial 3        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 4        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 5        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 6        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 7        property which is eligible for the High Impact 8        Business Investment Credit. To determine the portion 9        of a loan or loans that is secured by property eligible 10        for a Section 201(h) investment credit to the 11        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 12        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 13        divided into the basis of the Section 201(h) 14        investment credit property which secures the loan or 15        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 16        such property on the date that it was placed in service 17        in a federally designated Foreign Trade Zone or 18        Sub-Zone located in Illinois. No taxpayer that is 19        eligible for the deduction provided in subparagraph 20        (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be 21        eligible for the deduction provided under this 22        subparagraph (M-1). The subtraction modification 23        available to taxpayers in any year under this 24        subsection shall be that portion of the total interest 25        paid by the borrower with respect to such loan 26        attributable to the eligible property as calculated   SB0089- 49 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        under the previous sentence;2            (N) Two times any contribution made during the 3        taxable year to a designated zone organization to the 4        extent that the contribution (i) qualifies as a 5        charitable contribution under subsection (c) of 6        Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code and (ii) 7        must, by its terms, be used for a project approved by 8        the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 9        under Section 11 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act 10        or under Section 10-10 of the River Edge Redevelopment 11        Zone Act. This subparagraph (N) is exempt from the 12        provisions of Section 250;13            (O) An amount equal to: (i) 85% for taxable years 14        ending on or before December 31, 1992, or, a 15        percentage equal to the percentage allowable under 16        Section 243(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 17        for taxable years ending after December 31, 1992, of 18        the amount by which dividends included in taxable 19        income and received from a corporation that is not 20        created or organized under the laws of the United 21        States or any state or political subdivision thereof, 22        including, for taxable years ending on or after 23        December 31, 1988, dividends received or deemed 24        received or paid or deemed paid under Sections 951 25        through 965 of the Internal Revenue Code, exceed the 26        amount of the modification provided under subparagraph   SB0089- 50 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        (G) of paragraph (2) of this subsection (b) which is 2        related to such dividends, and including, for taxable 3        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 4        received from a captive real estate investment trust; 5        plus (ii) 100% of the amount by which dividends, 6        included in taxable income and received, including, 7        for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 8        1988, dividends received or deemed received or paid or 9        deemed paid under Sections 951 through 964 of the 10        Internal Revenue Code and including, for taxable years 11        ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 12        received from a captive real estate investment trust, 13        from any such corporation specified in clause (i) that 14        would but for the provisions of Section 1504(b)(3) of 15        the Internal Revenue Code be treated as a member of the 16        affiliated group which includes the dividend 17        recipient, exceed the amount of the modification 18        provided under subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of 19        this subsection (b) which is related to such 20        dividends. For taxable years ending on or after June 21        30, 2021, (i) for purposes of this subparagraph, the 22        term "dividend" does not include any amount treated as 23        a dividend under Section 1248 of the Internal Revenue 24        Code, and (ii) this subparagraph shall not apply to 25        dividends for which a deduction is allowed under 26        Section 245(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. This   SB0089- 51 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 2        Section 250 of this Act;3            (P) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 4        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 5        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;6            (Q) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 7        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 8        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 9        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 10        the Internal Revenue Code;11            (R) On and after July 20, 1999, in the case of an 12        attorney-in-fact with respect to whom an interinsurer 13        or a reciprocal insurer has made the election under 14        Section 835 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 15        835, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the 16        amounts paid or incurred by that interinsurer or 17        reciprocal insurer in the taxable year to the 18        attorney-in-fact over the deduction allowed to that 19        interinsurer or reciprocal insurer with respect to the 20        attorney-in-fact under Section 835(b) of the Internal 21        Revenue Code for the taxable year; the provisions of 22        this subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of 23        Section 250;24            (S) For taxable years ending on or after December 25        31, 1997, in the case of a Subchapter S corporation, an 26        amount equal to all amounts of income allocable to a   SB0089- 52 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        shareholder subject to the Personal Property Tax 2        Replacement Income Tax imposed by subsections (c) and 3        (d) of Section 201 of this Act, including amounts 4        allocable to organizations exempt from federal income 5        tax by reason of Section 501(a) of the Internal 6        Revenue Code. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 7        provisions of Section 250;8            (T) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 9        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 10        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 11        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 12        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 13        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:14                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 15            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 16            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 17            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 18            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 19            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 20            including the bonus depreciation deduction;21                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 22            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 23            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 24            0.429); and25                (3) for taxable years ending after December 26            31, 2005:  SB0089- 53 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1                    (i) for property on which a bonus 2                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 3                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 4                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 5                by 0.429);6                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 7                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 8                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 9                1.0;10                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 11                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 12                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 13                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 14                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 15                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 16                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 17                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 18                depreciation on that property; and19                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 20                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 21                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 22                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 23                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 24                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 25                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 26                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the   SB0089- 54 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 2                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 3            The aggregate amount deducted under this 4        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 5        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 6        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 7        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 8        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 9        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 10        Section 250;11            (U) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 12        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 13        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 14        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 15        equal to that addition modification.16            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 17        the last day of the last tax year for which a 18        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 19        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 20        required in any taxable year to make an addition 21        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 22        equal to that addition modification. 23            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 24        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 25        one piece of property.26            This subparagraph (U) is exempt from the   SB0089- 55 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        provisions of Section 250;2            (V) The amount of: (i) any interest income (net of 3        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 4        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 5        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 6        modification with respect to such transaction under 7        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 8        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 9        the amount of such addition modification, (ii) any 10        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 11        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 12        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 13        that is required to make an addition modification with 14        respect to such transaction under Section 15        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 16        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 17        addition modification, and (iii) any insurance premium 18        income (net of deductions allocable thereto) taken 19        into account for the taxable year with respect to a 20        transaction with a taxpayer that is required to make 21        an addition modification with respect to such 22        transaction under Section 203(a)(2)(D-19), Section 23        203(b)(2)(E-14), Section 203(c)(2)(G-14), or Section 24        203(d)(2)(D-9), but not to exceed the amount of that 25        addition modification. This subparagraph (V) is exempt 26        from the provisions of Section 250;   SB0089- 56 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            (W) An amount equal to the interest income taken 2        into account for the taxable year (net of the 3        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 4        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 5        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 6        for the fact that the foreign person's business 7        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 8        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 9        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 10        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 11        business group but for the fact that the person is 12        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 13        included in the unitary business group because he or 14        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 15        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 16        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 17        made for the same taxable year under Section 18        203(b)(2)(E-12) for interest paid, accrued, or 19        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 20        This subparagraph (W) is exempt from the provisions of 21        Section 250; 22            (X) An amount equal to the income from intangible 23        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 24        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 25        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 26        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but   SB0089- 57 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        for the fact that the foreign person's business 2        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 3        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 4        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 5        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 6        business group but for the fact that the person is 7        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 8        included in the unitary business group because he or 9        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 10        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 11        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 12        made for the same taxable year under Section 13        203(b)(2)(E-13) for intangible expenses and costs 14        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 15        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (X) is 16        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 17            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 18        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 19        add back any insurance premiums under Section 20        203(b)(2)(E-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 21        that part of a reimbursement received from the 22        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 23        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 24        company) that would have been taken into account as a 25        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 26        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer   SB0089- 58 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 2        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 3        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 4        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 5        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 6        Section 250; 7            (Z) The difference between the nondeductible 8        controlled foreign corporation dividends under Section 9        965(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code over the 10        taxable income of the taxpayer, computed without 11        regard to Section 965(e)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue 12        Code, and without regard to any net operating loss 13        deduction. This subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the 14        provisions of Section 250; and 15            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 16        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 17        operating in this State and licensed under the 18        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 19        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 20        organization operating in this State and licensed 21        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 22        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 23        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 24        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 25        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 26        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions   SB0089- 59 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        of Section 250. 2        (3) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (2)(A), 3    "gross income" in the case of a life insurance company, 4    for tax years ending on and after December 31, 1994, and 5    prior to December 31, 2011, shall mean the gross 6    investment income for the taxable year and, for tax years 7    ending on or after December 31, 2011, shall mean all 8    amounts included in life insurance gross income under 9    Section 803(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. 10    (c) Trusts and estates.11        (1) In general. In the case of a trust or estate, base 12    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 13    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).14        (2) Modifications. Subject to the provisions of 15    paragraph (3), the taxable income referred to in paragraph 16    (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum of the 17    following amounts:18            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 19        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 20        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 21        in the computation of taxable income;22            (B) In the case of (i) an estate, $600; (ii) a 23        trust which, under its governing instrument, is 24        required to distribute all of its income currently, 25        $300; and (iii) any other trust, $100, but in each such   SB0089- 60 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        case, only to the extent such amount was deducted in 2        the computation of taxable income;3            (C) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 4        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 5        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 6        year;7            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 8        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 9        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 10        ending prior to December 31, 1986;11            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 12        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 13        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 14        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 15        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 16        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 17        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 18        subtraction modifications in such taxable year, with 19        the following limitations applied in the order that 20        they are listed:21                (i) the addition modification relating to the 22            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 23            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 24            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 25            of addition modification under this subparagraph 26            (E) which related to that net operating loss and   SB0089- 61 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            which was taken into account in calculating the 2            base income of an earlier taxable year, and3                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 4            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 5            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 6            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 7            such carryback or carryforward;8            For taxable years in which there is a net 9        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 10        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 11        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 12        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 13        computed independently under the preceding provisions 14        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;15            (F) For taxable years ending on or after January 16        1, 1989, an amount equal to the tax deducted pursuant 17        to Section 164 of the Internal Revenue Code if the 18        trust or estate is claiming the same tax for purposes 19        of the Illinois foreign tax credit under Section 601 20        of this Act;21            (G) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 22        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 23        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 24        computation of taxable income;25            (G-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 26        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation   SB0089- 62 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        costs that the trust or estate deducted in computing 2        adjusted gross income and for which the trust or 3        estate claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 4        201;5            (G-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 6        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 7        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 8        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 9        the Internal Revenue Code; and10            (G-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 11        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 12        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 13        addition modification under subparagraph (G-10), then 14        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 15        deductions taken in all taxable years under 16        subparagraph (R) with respect to that property.17            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 18        the last day of the last tax year for which a 19        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 20        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 21        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 22        modification under subparagraph (R), then an amount 23        equal to that subtraction modification. 24            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 25        modification under this subparagraph only once with 26        respect to any one piece of property;  SB0089- 63 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            (G-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 2        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 3        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 4        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 6        member of the same unitary business group but for the 7        fact that the foreign person's business activity 8        outside the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 9        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 10        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 11        who would be a member of the same unitary business 12        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 13        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 14        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 15        required to apportion business income under different 16        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 17        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 18        extent that dividends were included in base income of 19        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 20        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 21        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 22        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 23        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 24        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 25        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 26        the same person to whom the interest was paid,   SB0089- 64 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        accrued, or incurred. 2            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 3                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 4            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 5            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 6            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 7            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 8            with respect to such interest; or9                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 10            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 11            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 12            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 13            following:14                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 15                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 16                to a person that is not a related member, and17                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 18                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 19                person did not have as a principal purpose the 20                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 21                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 22                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 23                terms; or 24                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 25            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 26            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract   SB0089- 65 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 2            and terms and the principal purpose for the 3            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 4            or 5                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 6            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 7            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 8            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 9            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 10            to the application or use of an alternative method 11            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 12                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 13            Director from making any other adjustment 14            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 15            for any tax year beginning after the effective 16            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 17            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 18            Department and such regulations provide methods 19            and standards by which the Department will utilize 20            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 21            (G-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 22        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 23        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 24        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 25        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 26        foreign person who would be a member of the same   SB0089- 66 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        unitary business group but for the fact that the 2        foreign person's business activity outside the United 3        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 4        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 6        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 7        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 8        from being included in the unitary business group 9        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 10        business income under different subsections of Section 11        304. The addition modification required by this 12        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 13        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 14        group for the same taxable year and received by the 15        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 16        business group (including amounts included in gross 17        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 18        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 19        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 20        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 21        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 22        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 23        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 24        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 25        modification required under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) of 26        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term   SB0089- 67 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        "intangible expenses and costs" includes: (1) 2        expenses, losses, and costs for or related to the 3        direct or indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or 4        management, ownership, sale, exchange, or any other 5        disposition of intangible property; (2) losses 6        incurred, directly or indirectly, from factoring 7        transactions or discounting transactions; (3) royalty, 8        patent, technical, and copyright fees; (4) licensing 9        fees; and (5) other similar expenses and costs. For 10        purposes of this subparagraph, "intangible property" 11        includes patents, patent applications, trade names, 12        trademarks, service marks, copyrights, mask works, 13        trade secrets, and similar types of intangible assets.14            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:15                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 16            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 17            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 18            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 19            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 20            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 21            with respect to such item; or22                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 23            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 24            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 25            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 26            following:  SB0089- 68 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1                    (a) the person during the same taxable 2                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 3                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 4                not a related member, and5                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 6                intangible expense or cost between the 7                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 8                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 9                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 10                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 11                or12                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 13            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 14            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 15            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 16            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 17            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 18            writing to the application or use of an 19            alternative method of apportionment under Section 20            304(f); 21                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 22            Director from making any other adjustment 23            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 24            for any tax year beginning after the effective 25            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 26            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the   SB0089- 69 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            Department and such regulations provide methods 2            and standards by which the Department will utilize 3            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 4            (G-14) For taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 6        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 7        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 8        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 9        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 10        business group but for the fact that the person is 11        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 12        included in the unitary business group because he or 13        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 14        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 15        addition modification required by this subparagraph 16        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 17        included in base income of the unitary group for the 18        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 19        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 20        (including amounts included in gross income under 21        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 22        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 23        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 24        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 25        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 26        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the   SB0089- 70 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 2        the addition modification required under Section 3        203(c)(2)(G-12) or Section 203(c)(2)(G-13) of this 4        Act;5            (G-15) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 6        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 7        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 8        Act;9            (G-16) For taxable years ending on or after 10        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 11        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 12        for the taxable year; 13            (G-17) the amount that is claimed as a federal 14        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 15        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 16        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 17        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 18        Tax Credit Act; 19    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 20    following amounts:21            (H) An amount equal to all amounts included in 22        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 23        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a) and 408 24        of the Internal Revenue Code or included in such total 25        as distributions under the provisions of any 26        retirement or disability plan for employees of any   SB0089- 71 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 2        retired partners, which payments are excluded in 3        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 4        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 5        adopted pursuant thereto;6            (I) The valuation limitation amount;7            (J) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 8        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 9        and included in such total for the taxable year;10            (K) An amount equal to all amounts included in 11        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 12        (C), (D), (E), (F) and (G) which are exempt from 13        taxation by this State either by reason of its 14        statutes or Constitution or by reason of the 15        Constitution, treaties or statutes of the United 16        States; provided that, in the case of any statute of 17        this State that exempts income derived from bonds or 18        other obligations from the tax imposed under this Act, 19        the amount exempted shall be the interest net of bond 20        premium amortization;21            (L) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 22        under subparagraph (K), an amount equal to the sum of 23        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 24        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 25        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 26        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the   SB0089- 72 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 2        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 3        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 4        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 5        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 6        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 7        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 8        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 9        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 10        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 11        250;12            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 13        such total which were paid by a corporation which 14        conducts business operations in a River Edge 15        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 16        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 17        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 18        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (M) is exempt from 19        the provisions of Section 250;20            (N) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 21        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 22        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;23            (O) An amount equal to those dividends included in 24        such total that were paid by a corporation that 25        conducts business operations in a federally designated 26        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated   SB0089- 73 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 2        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 3        subparagraph (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 4        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 5        this subparagraph (O);6            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 7        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 8        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 9        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 10        the Internal Revenue Code;11            (Q) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 12        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 13        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 14        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 15        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 16        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 17        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 18        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 19        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 20        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 21        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 22        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 23        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 24        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 25        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 26        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a   SB0089- 74 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 2        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 3        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 4        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 5        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 6        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 7        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this 8        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 9        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 10        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 11        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 12        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 13        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 14        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 15        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 16        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 17        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;18            (R) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 19        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 20        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 21        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 22        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 23        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:24                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 25            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 26            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property   SB0089- 75 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 2            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 3            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 4            including the bonus depreciation deduction;5                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 6            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 7            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 8            0.429); and9                (3) for taxable years ending after December 10            31, 2005:11                    (i) for property on which a bonus 12                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 13                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 14                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 15                by 0.429);16                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 17                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 18                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 19                1.0;20                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 21                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 22                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 23                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 24                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 25                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 26                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the   SB0089- 76 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 2                depreciation on that property; and3                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 4                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 5                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 6                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 7                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 8                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 9                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 10                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 11                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 12                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 13            The aggregate amount deducted under this 14        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 15        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 16        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 17        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 18        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 19        subparagraph (R) is exempt from the provisions of 20        Section 250;21            (S) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 22        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 23        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 24        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount 25        equal to that addition modification.26            If the taxpayer continues to own property through   SB0089- 77 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        the last day of the last tax year for which a 2        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 3        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 4        required in any taxable year to make an addition 5        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount 6        equal to that addition modification. 7            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 8        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 9        one piece of property.10            This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 11        provisions of Section 250;12            (T) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 13        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 14        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 15        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 16        modification with respect to such transaction under 17        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 18        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 19        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 20        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 21        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 22        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 23        that is required to make an addition modification with 24        respect to such transaction under Section 25        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 26        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such   SB0089- 78 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        addition modification. This subparagraph (T) is exempt 2        from the provisions of Section 250; 3            (U) An amount equal to the interest income taken 4        into account for the taxable year (net of the 5        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 6        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 7        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 8        for the fact the foreign person's business activity 9        outside the United States is 80% or more of that 10        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 11        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 12        who would be a member of the same unitary business 13        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 14        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 15        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 16        required to apportion business income under different 17        subsections of Section 304, but not to exceed the 18        addition modification required to be made for the same 19        taxable year under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) for 20        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 21        indirectly, to the same person. This subparagraph (U) 22        is exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 23            (V) An amount equal to the income from intangible 24        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 25        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 26        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a   SB0089- 79 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 2        for the fact that the foreign person's business 3        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 4        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 5        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 6        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 7        business group but for the fact that the person is 8        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 9        included in the unitary business group because he or 10        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 11        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 12        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 13        made for the same taxable year under Section 14        203(c)(2)(G-13) for intangible expenses and costs 15        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 16        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (V) is 17        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 18            (W) in the case of an estate, an amount equal to 19        all amounts included in such total pursuant to the 20        provisions of Section 111 of the Internal Revenue Code 21        as a recovery of items previously deducted by the 22        decedent from adjusted gross income in the computation 23        of taxable income. This subparagraph (W) is exempt 24        from Section 250; 25            (X) an amount equal to the refund included in such 26        total of any tax deducted for federal income tax   SB0089- 80 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        purposes, to the extent that deduction was added back 2        under subparagraph (F). This subparagraph (X) is 3        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;4            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 5        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 6        add back any insurance premiums under Section 7        203(c)(2)(G-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 8        that part of a reimbursement received from the 9        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 10        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 11        company) that would have been taken into account as a 12        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 13        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 14        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 15        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 16        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 17        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 18        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 19        Section 250;20            (Z) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 21        2018 and before January 1, 2026, the amount of excess 22        business loss of the taxpayer disallowed as a 23        deduction by Section 461(l)(1)(B) of the Internal 24        Revenue Code; and 25            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 26        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment   SB0089- 81 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        operating in this State and licensed under the 2        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 3        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 4        organization operating in this State and licensed 5        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 6        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 7        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 8        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 9        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 10        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 11        of Section 250. 12        (3) Limitation. The amount of any modification 13    otherwise required under this subsection shall, under 14    regulations prescribed by the Department, be adjusted by 15    any amounts included therein which were properly paid, 16    credited, or required to be distributed, or permanently 17    set aside for charitable purposes pursuant to Internal 18    Revenue Code Section 642(c) during the taxable year. 19    (d) Partnerships.20        (1) In general. In the case of a partnership, base 21    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 22    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).23        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 24    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 25    of the following amounts:  SB0089- 82 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 2        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 3        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 4        in the computation of taxable income;5            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 6        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income for 7        the taxable year;8            (C) The amount of deductions allowed to the 9        partnership pursuant to Section 707 (c) of the 10        Internal Revenue Code in calculating its taxable 11        income;12            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 13        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 14        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 15        computation of taxable income;16            (D-5) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 17        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 18        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 19        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 20        the Internal Revenue Code;21            (D-6) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 22        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 23        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 24        addition modification under subparagraph (D-5), then 25        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 26        deductions taken in all taxable years under   SB0089- 83 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        subparagraph (O) with respect to that property.2            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 3        the last day of the last tax year for which a 4        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 5        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 6        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 7        modification under subparagraph (O), then an amount 8        equal to that subtraction modification. 9            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 10        modification under this subparagraph only once with 11        respect to any one piece of property;12            (D-7) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 13        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 14        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 15        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 16        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 17        member of the same unitary business group but for the 18        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 19        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 20        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 21        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 22        who would be a member of the same unitary business 23        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 24        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 25        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 26        required to apportion business income under different   SB0089- 84 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 2        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 3        extent that dividends were included in base income of 4        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 5        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 6        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 7        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 8        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 9        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 10        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 11        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 12        accrued, or incurred. 13            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 14                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 15            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 16            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 17            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 18            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 19            with respect to such interest; or20                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 21            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 22            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 23            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 24            following:25                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 26                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest   SB0089- 85 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1                to a person that is not a related member, and2                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 3                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 4                person did not have as a principal purpose the 5                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 6                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 7                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 8                terms; or 9                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 10            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 11            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 12            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 13            and terms and the principal purpose for the 14            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 15            or 16                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 17            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 18            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 19            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 20            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 21            to the application or use of an alternative method 22            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 23                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 24            Director from making any other adjustment 25            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 26            for any tax year beginning after the effective   SB0089- 86 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 2            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 3            Department and such regulations provide methods 4            and standards by which the Department will utilize 5            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; and 6            (D-8) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 7        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 8        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 9        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 10        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 11        foreign person who would be a member of the same 12        unitary business group but for the fact that the 13        foreign person's business activity outside the United 14        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 15        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 16        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 17        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 18        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 19        from being included in the unitary business group 20        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 21        business income under different subsections of Section 22        304. The addition modification required by this 23        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 24        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 25        group for the same taxable year and received by the 26        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary   SB0089- 87 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        business group (including amounts included in gross 2        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 3        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 4        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 5        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 6        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 7        indirectly paid, incurred or accrued. The preceding 8        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 9        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 10        modification required under Section 203(d)(2)(D-7) of 11        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 12        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 13        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 14        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 15        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 16        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 17        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 18        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 19        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 20        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 21        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 22        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 23        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 24        similar types of intangible assets;25            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:26                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs   SB0089- 88 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 2            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 3            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 4            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 5            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 6            with respect to such item; or7                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 8            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 9            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 10            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 11            following:12                    (a) the person during the same taxable 13                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 14                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 15                not a related member, and16                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 17                intangible expense or cost between the 18                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 19                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 20                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 21                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 22                or23                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 24            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 25            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 26            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing   SB0089- 89 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 2            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 3            writing to the application or use of an 4            alternative method of apportionment under Section 5            304(f); 6                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 7            Director from making any other adjustment 8            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 9            for any tax year beginning after the effective 10            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 11            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 12            Department and such regulations provide methods 13            and standards by which the Department will utilize 14            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 15            (D-9) For taxable years ending on or after 16        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 17        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 18        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 19        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 20        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 21        business group but for the fact that the person is 22        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 23        included in the unitary business group because he or 24        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 25        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 26        addition modification required by this subparagraph   SB0089- 90 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 2        included in base income of the unitary group for the 3        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 4        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 5        (including amounts included in gross income under 6        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 7        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 8        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 9        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 10        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 11        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 12        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 13        the addition modification required under Section 14        203(d)(2)(D-7) or Section 203(d)(2)(D-8) of this Act;15            (D-10) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 16        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 17        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 18        Act;19            (D-11) For taxable years ending on or after 20        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 21        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 22        for the taxable year; 23            (D-12) the amount that is claimed as a federal 24        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 25        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 26        attributable to an endowment gift for which the   SB0089- 91 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 2        Tax Credit Act; 3    and by deducting from the total so obtained the following 4    amounts:5            (E) The valuation limitation amount;6            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 7        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 8        and included in such total for the taxable year;9            (G) An amount equal to all amounts included in 10        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 11        (C) and (D) which are exempt from taxation by this 12        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 13        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 14        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 15        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 16        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 17        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 18        net of bond premium amortization;19            (H) Any income of the partnership which 20        constitutes personal service income as defined in 21        Section 1348(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code (as in 22        effect December 31, 1981) or a reasonable allowance 23        for compensation paid or accrued for services rendered 24        by partners to the partnership, whichever is greater; 25        this subparagraph (H) is exempt from the provisions of 26        Section 250;  SB0089- 92 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1            (I) An amount equal to all amounts of income 2        distributable to an entity subject to the Personal 3        Property Tax Replacement Income Tax imposed by 4        subsections (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act 5        including amounts distributable to organizations 6        exempt from federal income tax by reason of Section 7        501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; this subparagraph 8        (I) is exempt from the provisions of Section 250;9            (J) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 10        under subparagraph (G), an amount equal to the sum of 11        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 12        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 13        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 14        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 15        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 16        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 17        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 18        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 19        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 20        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 21        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 22        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 23        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 24        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 25        250;26            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in   SB0089- 93 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        such total which were paid by a corporation which 2        conducts business operations in a River Edge 3        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 4        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 5        all of its operations from a River Edge Redevelopment 6        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 7        the provisions of Section 250;8            (L) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 9        job training project established pursuant to the Real 10        Property Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;11            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 12        such total that were paid by a corporation that 13        conducts business operations in a federally designated 14        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 15        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 16        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 17        subparagraph (K) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 18        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 19        this subparagraph (M);20            (N) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 21        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 22        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 23        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 24        the Internal Revenue Code;25            (O) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 26        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction   SB0089- 94 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 2        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 3        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 4        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:5                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 6            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 7            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 8            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 9            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 10            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 11            including the bonus depreciation deduction;12                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 13            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 14            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 15            0.429); and16                (3) for taxable years ending after December 17            31, 2005:18                    (i) for property on which a bonus 19                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 20                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 21                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 22                by 0.429);23                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 24                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 25                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 26                1.0;  SB0089- 95 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 2                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 3                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 4                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 5                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 6                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 7                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 8                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 9                depreciation on that property; and10                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 11                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 12                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 13                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 14                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 15                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 16                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 17                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 18                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 19                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 20            The aggregate amount deducted under this 21        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 22        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 23        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 24        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 25        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 26        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of   SB0089- 96 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        Section 250;2            (P) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 3        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 4        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 5        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 6        equal to that addition modification.7            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 8        the last day of the last tax year for which a 9        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 10        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 11        required in any taxable year to make an addition 12        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 13        equal to that addition modification. 14            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 15        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 16        one piece of property.17            This subparagraph (P) is exempt from the 18        provisions of Section 250;19            (Q) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 20        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 21        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 22        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 23        modification with respect to such transaction under 24        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 25        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 26        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any   SB0089- 97 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 2        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 3        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 4        that is required to make an addition modification with 5        respect to such transaction under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 7        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 8        addition modification. This subparagraph (Q) is exempt 9        from Section 250; 10            (R) An amount equal to the interest income taken 11        into account for the taxable year (net of the 12        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 13        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 14        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 15        for the fact that the foreign person's business 16        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 17        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 18        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 19        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 20        business group but for the fact that the person is 21        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 22        included in the unitary business group because he or 23        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 24        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 25        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 26        made for the same taxable year under Section   SB0089- 98 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        203(d)(2)(D-7) for interest paid, accrued, or 2        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 3        This subparagraph (R) is exempt from Section 250; 4            (S) An amount equal to the income from intangible 5        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 6        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 7        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 8        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 9        for the fact that the foreign person's business 10        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 11        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 12        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 13        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 14        business group but for the fact that the person is 15        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 16        included in the unitary business group because he or 17        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 18        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 19        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 20        made for the same taxable year under Section 21        203(d)(2)(D-8) for intangible expenses and costs paid, 22        accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to the 23        same person. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from 24        Section 250; 25            (T) For taxable years ending on or after December 26        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to   SB0089- 99 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        add back any insurance premiums under Section 2        203(d)(2)(D-9), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 3        that part of a reimbursement received from the 4        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 5        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 6        company) that would have been taken into account as a 7        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 8        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 9        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 10        (T), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 11        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 12        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (T). This 13        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 14        Section 250; and 15            (U) For taxable years beginning on or after 16        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 17        operating in this State and licensed under the 18        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 19        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 20        organization operating in this State and licensed 21        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 22        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 23        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 24        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 25        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 26        this subparagraph (U) are exempt from the provisions   SB0089- 100 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        of Section 250.  2    (e) Gross income; adjusted gross income; taxable income.3        (1) In general. Subject to the provisions of paragraph 4    (2) and subsection (b)(3), for purposes of this Section 5    and Section 803(e), a taxpayer's gross income, adjusted 6    gross income, or taxable income for the taxable year shall 7    mean the amount of gross income, adjusted gross income or 8    taxable income properly reportable for federal income tax 9    purposes for the taxable year under the provisions of the 10    Internal Revenue Code. Taxable income may be less than 11    zero. However, for taxable years ending on or after 12    December 31, 1986, net operating loss carryforwards from 13    taxable years ending prior to December 31, 1986, may not 14    exceed the sum of federal taxable income for the taxable 15    year before net operating loss deduction, plus the excess 16    of addition modifications over subtraction modifications 17    for the taxable year. For taxable years ending prior to 18    December 31, 1986, taxable income may never be an amount 19    in excess of the net operating loss for the taxable year as 20    defined in subsections (c) and (d) of Section 172 of the 21    Internal Revenue Code, provided that when taxable income 22    of a corporation (other than a Subchapter S corporation), 23    trust, or estate is less than zero and addition 24    modifications, other than those provided by subparagraph 25    (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) for corporations or   SB0089- 101 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1    subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) for 2    trusts and estates, exceed subtraction modifications, an 3    addition modification must be made under those 4    subparagraphs for any other taxable year to which the 5    taxable income less than zero (net operating loss) is 6    applied under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code or 7    under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 8    (e) applied in conjunction with Section 172 of the 9    Internal Revenue Code.10        (2) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (1) of 11    this subsection, the taxable income properly reportable 12    for federal income tax purposes shall mean:13            (A) Certain life insurance companies. In the case 14        of a life insurance company subject to the tax imposed 15        by Section 801 of the Internal Revenue Code, life 16        insurance company taxable income, plus the amount of 17        distribution from pre-1984 policyholder surplus 18        accounts as calculated under Section 815a of the 19        Internal Revenue Code;20            (B) Certain other insurance companies. In the case 21        of mutual insurance companies subject to the tax 22        imposed by Section 831 of the Internal Revenue Code, 23        insurance company taxable income;24            (C) Regulated investment companies. In the case of 25        a regulated investment company subject to the tax 26        imposed by Section 852 of the Internal Revenue Code,   SB0089- 102 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        investment company taxable income;2            (D) Real estate investment trusts. In the case of 3        a real estate investment trust subject to the tax 4        imposed by Section 857 of the Internal Revenue Code, 5        real estate investment trust taxable income;6            (E) Consolidated corporations. In the case of a 7        corporation which is a member of an affiliated group 8        of corporations filing a consolidated income tax 9        return for the taxable year for federal income tax 10        purposes, taxable income determined as if such 11        corporation had filed a separate return for federal 12        income tax purposes for the taxable year and each 13        preceding taxable year for which it was a member of an 14        affiliated group. For purposes of this subparagraph, 15        the taxpayer's separate taxable income shall be 16        determined as if the election provided by Section 17        243(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code had been in 18        effect for all such years;19            (F) Cooperatives. In the case of a cooperative 20        corporation or association, the taxable income of such 21        organization determined in accordance with the 22        provisions of Section 1381 through 1388 of the 23        Internal Revenue Code, but without regard to the 24        prohibition against offsetting losses from patronage 25        activities against income from nonpatronage 26        activities; except that a cooperative corporation or   SB0089- 103 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        association may make an election to follow its federal 2        income tax treatment of patronage losses and 3        nonpatronage losses. In the event such election is 4        made, such losses shall be computed and carried over 5        in a manner consistent with subsection (a) of Section 6        207 of this Act and apportioned by the apportionment 7        factor reported by the cooperative on its Illinois 8        income tax return filed for the taxable year in which 9        the losses are incurred. The election shall be 10        effective for all taxable years with original returns 11        due on or after the date of the election. In addition, 12        the cooperative may file an amended return or returns, 13        as allowed under this Act, to provide that the 14        election shall be effective for losses incurred or 15        carried forward for taxable years occurring prior to 16        the date of the election. Once made, the election may 17        only be revoked upon approval of the Director. The 18        Department shall adopt rules setting forth 19        requirements for documenting the elections and any 20        resulting Illinois net loss and the standards to be 21        used by the Director in evaluating requests to revoke 22        elections. Public Act 96-932 is declaratory of 23        existing law; 24            (G) Subchapter S corporations. In the case of: (i) 25        a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 26        effect an election for the taxable year under Section   SB0089- 104 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        1362 of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable income 2        of such corporation determined in accordance with 3        Section 1363(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, except 4        that taxable income shall take into account those 5        items which are required by Section 1363(b)(1) of the 6        Internal Revenue Code to be separately stated; and 7        (ii) a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 8        effect a federal election to opt out of the provisions 9        of the Subchapter S Revision Act of 1982 and have 10        applied instead the prior federal Subchapter S rules 11        as in effect on July 1, 1982, the taxable income of 12        such corporation determined in accordance with the 13        federal Subchapter S rules as in effect on July 1, 14        1982; and15            (H) Partnerships. In the case of a partnership, 16        taxable income determined in accordance with Section 17        703 of the Internal Revenue Code, except that taxable 18        income shall take into account those items which are 19        required by Section 703(a)(1) to be separately stated 20        but which would be taken into account by an individual 21        in calculating his taxable income.22        (3) Recapture of business expenses on disposition of 23    asset or business. Notwithstanding any other law to the 24    contrary, if in prior years income from an asset or 25    business has been classified as business income and in a 26    later year is demonstrated to be non-business income, then   SB0089- 105 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1    all expenses, without limitation, deducted in such later 2    year and in the 2 immediately preceding taxable years 3    related to that asset or business that generated the 4    non-business income shall be added back and recaptured as 5    business income in the year of the disposition of the 6    asset or business. Such amount shall be apportioned to 7    Illinois using the greater of the apportionment fraction 8    computed for the business under Section 304 of this Act 9    for the taxable year or the average of the apportionment 10    fractions computed for the business under Section 304 of 11    this Act for the taxable year and for the 2 immediately 12    preceding taxable years.  13    (f) Valuation limitation amount.14        (1) In general. The valuation limitation amount 15    referred to in subsections (a)(2)(G), (c)(2)(I) and 16    (d)(2)(E) is an amount equal to:17            (A) The sum of the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 18        amounts (to the extent consisting of gain reportable 19        under the provisions of Section 1245 or 1250 of the 20        Internal Revenue Code) for all property in respect of 21        which such gain was reported for the taxable year; 22        plus23            (B) The lesser of (i) the sum of the pre-August 1, 24        1969 appreciation amounts (to the extent consisting of 25        capital gain) for all property in respect of which   SB0089- 106 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        such gain was reported for federal income tax purposes 2        for the taxable year, or (ii) the net capital gain for 3        the taxable year, reduced in either case by any amount 4        of such gain included in the amount determined under 5        subsection (a)(2)(F) or (c)(2)(H).6        (2) Pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation amount.7            (A) If the fair market value of property referred 8        to in paragraph (1) was readily ascertainable on 9        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 10        amount for such property is the lesser of (i) the 11        excess of such fair market value over the taxpayer's 12        basis (for determining gain) for such property on that 13        date (determined under the Internal Revenue Code as in 14        effect on that date), or (ii) the total gain realized 15        and reportable for federal income tax purposes in 16        respect of the sale, exchange or other disposition of 17        such property.18            (B) If the fair market value of property referred 19        to in paragraph (1) was not readily ascertainable on 20        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 21        amount for such property is that amount which bears 22        the same ratio to the total gain reported in respect of 23        the property for federal income tax purposes for the 24        taxable year, as the number of full calendar months in 25        that part of the taxpayer's holding period for the 26        property ending July 31, 1969 bears to the number of   SB0089- 107 -LRB104 03295 HLH 13317 b1        full calendar months in the taxpayer's entire holding 2        period for the property.3            (C) The Department shall prescribe such 4        regulations as may be necessary to carry out the 5        purposes of this paragraph. 6    (g) Double deductions. Unless specifically provided 7otherwise, nothing in this Section shall permit the same item 8to be deducted more than once. 9    (h) Legislative intention. Except as expressly provided by 10this Section there shall be no modifications or limitations on 11the amounts of income, gain, loss or deduction taken into 12account in determining gross income, adjusted gross income or 13taxable income for federal income tax purposes for the taxable 14year, or in the amount of such items entering into the 15computation of base income and net income under this Act for 16such taxable year, whether in respect of property values as of 17August 1, 1969 or otherwise.18(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 19102-658, eff. 8-27-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1112, eff. 2012-21-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-478, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, 21Article 10, Section 10-900, eff. 6-7-24; 103-592, Article 170, 22Section 170-90, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-647, 23eff. 7-1-24; revised 8-20-24.)